Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-163
Commission; duties.

The commission shall file with the Clerk of the Legislature an annual report on or before September 30 of each year on the status of the Nebraska telecommunications industry. The report shall be submitted in electronic format. The report shall:

(1) Describe the quality of telecommunications service being provided to the citizens of Nebraska;

(2) Describe the availability of diverse and affordable telecommunications service to all of the people of Nebraska;

(3) Describe the level of telecommunications service rates;

(4) Describe the use and continued need for the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund;

(5) Describe the availability and location of 911 service as required by section 86-1080;

(6) Describe the availability and location of next-generation 911 service as required by section 86-1073;

(7) Address the need for further legislation to achieve the purposes of the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act; and

(8) Assess, based on information provided by public safety answering points, the level of next-generation 911 location accuracy compliance for wireless carriers.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 286, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-804;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 62;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 243;

Laws 2016, LB938, § 31;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 8.